Illinois, session 104th, HB5059.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Oversight and Regulation of Activity for Contracts Linked to 6Events (ORACLE) Act. 7    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Athletic event" means an organized competition between 2 9or more persons or groups of persons that involves physical or 10mental skill. "Athletic event" includes horse racing and prop 11betting.12    "Athletic event market" means a prediction market that 13enables a consumer to open a speculative position on the 14outcome of a specific athletic event or events or events 15within an athletic event or events. "Athletic event market" 16does not include the opening of a speculative position on the 17final outcome of an athletic tournament or on a combination of 18all outcomes of each event within an athletic tournament, such 19as opening a speculative position on the overall champion of a 20sports tournament or a bracket predicting all results of a 21tournament.22    "Athletic tournament" means a series of athletic events in 23which the winners of individual events progress to compete in   HB5059- 2 -LRB104 18213 LNS 31652 b1subsequent events until a final overall winner is determined.2    "Bid-ask format" means a format in which parties submit 3offers to buy positions on a prediction market at a specific 4price or range of prices and offers to sell positions at a 5specific price or range of prices, with market prices 6determined through the matching of these offers.7    "Catastrophic event market" means a prediction market that 8enables a consumer to open a speculative position on an 9outcome that relates to war, state or national emergencies, 10natural or human-made disasters, mass shootings, acts of 11terrorism, or public health crises or the ancillary effects 12thereof.13    "Clearly and conspicuously" or "clear and conspicuous" has 14the meaning given to those terms in Section 5 of the Automatic 15Contract Renewal Act.16    "Consumer" means an individual who is a resident of the 17State.18    "Death market" means a prediction market that enables a 19consumer to open a speculative position on the death, 20assassination, or attempted killing of a person or group of 21persons, or on mass casualty events. "Death market" does not 22include a prediction market where the outcome could indirectly 23depend on a death as a consequence of a person's inclusion in 24the market, such as a lawful prediction market which depends 25on a person engaging in some action where the person's death 26would naturally settle the market as such person not engaging   HB5059- 3 -LRB104 18213 LNS 31652 b1in such action.2    "Illinois Gambling Help Hotline" means the Illinois 3Gambling Help Hotline 1-800-GAMBLER and the texting help line 4of texting "ILGAMB" to 833234.5    "Liquidity provider" or "market maker" shall mean any 6person or entity that, directly or indirectly, and whether 7manually or through automated means, offers to buy or sell a 8position in a prediction market with the primary purpose of 9facilitating trading, supporting price discovery, or 10maintaining market liquidity by posting bids and asks.11    "Prediction market" means a system that allows consumers 12to open a speculative position on the outcome of future events 13in a bid-ask format. "Prediction market" includes all forms of 14prediction markets regardless of the mechanisms or structures 15used for opening speculative positions on future events.16    "Prediction market platform" means any platform or service 17that provides consumers with the ability to open speculative 18positions on the outcomes of future events.19    "Political market" means a prediction market that enables 20a consumer to open a speculative position that relates to:21        (1) a federal election, a State election, or an 22    election held by a unit of local government within the 23    State; or24        (2) the actions or conduct of the federal government 25    or its agencies, employees, officers, or leaders, the 26    State government or its agencies, employees, officers, or   HB5059- 4 -LRB104 18213 LNS 31652 b1    leaders, or a unit of local government in this State or its 2    agencies, employees, officers, or leaders in their 3    official government capacity.4    "Security market" means a prediction market that enables a 5consumer to open a speculative position on the price of a 6publicly traded company.7    "Settlement source" means an entity from which the 8prediction market platform obtains or sources information for 9the purpose of determining the outcome of a market.10    "Speculative position" means a financial commitment made 11by a participant in a prediction market. 12    Section 10. Age restrictions.13    (a) No prediction market platform provider shall permit 14any consumer under the age of 21 to register or to open any 15speculative position on a prediction market.16    (b) If the prediction market platform provider has 17inadvertently permitted a consumer that is under the age of 21 18to use the prediction market platform provider's platform and 19such prediction market platform provider discovers the error, 20the prediction market platform provider shall immediately 21suspend that account, close all positions on that account, pay 22out to the consumer any funds on the account, and prohibit the 23individual from further use of the provider's platform until 24such consumer has attained the age of 21.   HB5059- 5 -LRB104 18213 LNS 31652 b1    Section 15. Exclusions from participation. A prediction 2market platform provider shall maintain and enforce policies 3to exclude certain individuals from participation, including:4        (1) any person who has self-excluded from using the 5    platform;6        (2) any officer, director, employee, or agent of the 7    prediction market platform provider or its affiliated 8    companies;9        (3) any officer, director, employee, or agent of a 10    source settlement provider;11        (4) any person who has insider information on a 12    particular market or markets; and13        (5) any other category of persons the Attorney General 14    by rule designates as excluded.15    The exclusion shall be enforced until the person no longer 16meets the criteria required for exclusion under this Section. 17    Section 20. Certain markets prohibited. A prediction 18market platform provider shall not permit State users to open 19a speculative position on the following types of markets:20        (1) catastrophic event markets;21        (2) political markets;22        (3) death markets;23        (4) security markets; and24        (5) athletic event markets.   HB5059- 6 -LRB104 18213 LNS 31652 b1    Section 25. Settlement sources.2    (a) Each prediction market platform provider shall 3maintain a comprehensive list of all settlement sources that 4the prediction market platform provider uses to determine the 5outcomes of the prediction market platform provider's 6prediction markets and shall make this list readily accessible 7to consumers at all stages of the registration process.8    (b) Each prediction market platform provider shall 9display, on every section of the prediction market platform 10provider's website in which a person can open a speculative 11position on a specific prediction market, the settlement 12source for the settlement of such market.13    (c) No prediction market platform provider shall settle a 14market based on proprietary or confidential information. 15    Section 30. Responsible gaming measures. 16    (a) Each prediction market platform provider shall 17implement and adhere to responsible gaming measures to protect 18consumers who may be at risk of problem gambling behavior. 19Such measures shall include, at a minimum:20        (1) providing a mechanism by which an individual can 21    voluntarily self-exclude from the platform for a definite 22    or indefinite period. If a consumer self-excludes, the 23    prediction market platform provider must immediately block 24    such consumer's access to opening a speculative position 25    and take reasonable steps to prevent the consumer from   HB5059- 7 -LRB104 18213 LNS 31652 b1    creating new accounts;2        (2) allowing consumers to set daily, weekly, or 3    monthly limits on the amount they can deposit or spend in 4    opening speculative positions, if they so choose. The 5    platform may not encourage consumers to remove or increase 6    limits once set; any request to increase a self-imposed 7    limit shall have a 14-day waiting period;8        (3) providing features that allow consumers to limit 9    the amount of time spent on the platform, and periodic 10    notifications that remind consumers of how long they have 11    been active and their net spending or winnings during that 12    session; and13        (4) clearly posting and providing the Illinois 14    Gambling Help Hotline number "1-800-GAMBLER" and the 15    texting help line by texting "ILGAMB" to 833234 on the 16    platform's website and apps in any advertisements. No 17    other problem gambling hotline may be displayed.18    All advertisements and marketing materials must include a 19responsible gambling message and the Illinois Gambling Help 20Hotline number in a clear and conspicuous manner.21    (b) Each prediction market platform provider shall 22implement training for employees to recognize and respond to 23indications of problem gambling, including how they can direct 24consumers to resources for help.25    (c) Each prediction market platform provider shall 26implement policies to identify problem gambling and shall,   HB5059- 8 -LRB104 18213 LNS 31652 b1upon making a determination that a user is engaged in problem 2gambling, prohibit access to the provider's service.3    (d) Each prediction market platform provider shall comply 4with the advertising standards set forth in Section 35. 5    Section 35. Advertising restrictions.6    (a) All advertising by a licensed prediction market 7platform shall be truthful and not misleading.8    (b) A prediction market platform provider shall be 9prohibited from sending push notifications to users that 10pertain to bonuses or prediction markets that the user does 11not currently have an open speculative position on.12    (c) No advertisement shall depict a person under the age 13of 21, except incidentally.14    (d) No advertisements shall target persons under the age 15of 21 or other vulnerable classes of persons, which the 16Attorney General may designate by rule.17    (e) A prediction market platform provider shall not 18advertise in a manner that is calculated to reach individuals 19on the self-exclusion list or individuals known to have 20engaged in problem gambling.21    (f) Every advertisement for a prediction market platform 22shall include the Illinois Gambling Help Hotline number. If 23the advertisement is a video, the Illinois Gambling Help 24Hotline number shall be visible for the entire duration of the 25video. If the advertisement is auditory only in nature, the   HB5059- 9 -LRB104 18213 LNS 31652 b1Illinois Gambling Help Hotline number shall be stated at the 2beginning and end of the advertisement.3    (g) No advertisement may suggest that the prediction 4market product is endorsed by the State or any governmental 5agency, except that it may state that the platform is licensed 6within the State.7    (h) A prediction market platform provider shall provide 8consumers with a readily accessible way to opt out of direct 9marketing. Upon a consumer's request, the prediction market 10platform provider shall cease sending them promotional 11material.12    (i) No promotion may be advertised as "risk-free" or of 13similar language.14    (j) If the prediction market platform provider offers 15bonuses, free credits, referral rewards, or other promotions 16to consumers, the terms and conditions of these offers must be 17described in plain language and shall be readily available to 18the consumer prior to the consumer accepting such bonuses, 19free credits, referral rewards, or other promotions.20    (k) Where a prediction market platform provider uses 21affiliate marketers or third-party promoters to promote the 22prediction market platform provider's platform, the prediction 23market platform provider shall be responsible for ensuring 24such third parties also comply with the advertising standards 25required by this Section and are liable for noncompliance with 26the provisions of this Section.  HB5059- 10 -LRB104 18213 LNS 31652 b1    (l) The Attorney General may adopt additional rules 2pertaining to advertising by prediction market providers. 3    Section 40. Restrictions on credit-based products and gift 4certificates. 5    (a) No prediction market platform provider or another, 6whether affiliated or otherwise, shall sell physical or 7digital gift certificates in relation to its platform.8    (b) No prediction market platform provider shall permit a 9consumer to use a credit card or other credit-based product to 10add funds to such consumer's account or, in any way, wager on a 11prediction market. 12    Section 45. Restrictions on market making. 13    (a) A prediction market platform provider shall not offer 14a prediction market in the State if the market includes, as a 15liquidity provider or market maker, any person or entity who 16knowingly engages in gaming activities in the ordinary course 17of business, whether within or outside the State. This 18prohibition shall also apply to any affiliated entities, 19subsidiaries, parent companies, joint ventures, partnerships, 20agents, employees, or any entity acting at the direction of, 21in cooperation with, or for the financial benefit of such a 22person or entity.23    (b) A prediction market provider shall not offer markets 24to residents where in such markets there is a contract or share   HB5059- 11 -LRB104 18213 LNS 31652 b1of revenue with a person or entity who knowingly engages in 2gaming activities in the ordinary course of business, whether 3within or outside the State. This prohibition shall also apply 4to any affiliated entities, subsidiaries, parent companies, 5joint ventures, partnerships, agents, employees, or any entity 6acting at the direction of, in cooperation with, or for the 7financial benefit of such a person or entity. 8    Section 50. Certain contract provisions void. 9    (a) A prediction market platform provider's terms of 10service shall not alter or eliminate any right provided to a 11consumer under this Act.12    (b) Any agreement that violates any provision of this Act 13shall be deemed void. 14    Section 55. Insider trading and market manipulation. 15    (a) A prediction market platform provider shall implement 16commercially reasonable and technically feasible measures to 17detect and prevent any fraudulent or manipulative conduct by 18participants or others. If the prediction market platform 19provider detects potential manipulation, insider trading, or 20fraud, it shall report it to the Attorney General and, if 21appropriate, to law enforcement.22    (b) A person who engages in insider trading or market 23manipulation may be subject to penalties as prescribed by 24Section 20-70 of the Digital Assets and Consumer Protection   HB5059- 12 -LRB104 18213 LNS 31652 b1Act. 2    Section 60. Penalties.3    (a) A prediction market platform provider who violates a 4provision of this Act, or a rule or order adopted under this 5Act, shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 6for each violation. If the Attorney General determines that 7the prediction market platform provider has engaged in a 8persistent course of conduct in violation of this Act, the 9Attorney General may impose a civil penalty not to exceed 10$50,000 for each violation.11    (b) If a prediction market platform provider violates the 12provisions of Section 15 or 45, the civil penalty shall be the 13greater of 2 times the profits derived from the market or 14$50,000.15    (c) If the Attorney General believes from evidence 16satisfactory to the Attorney General that a prediction market 17platform provider has engaged in a persistent course of 18conduct in violation of this Act, the Attorney General may 19bring an action in the name and on behalf of the State in a 20court having jurisdiction to issue an injunction to enjoin and 21restrain the continuation of such violation. In such action, 22the court shall order the prediction market platform provider 23to cease operations in the State.24    (d) If a prediction market platform provider continues to 25operate in the State after an order under subsection (c) is   HB5059- 13 -LRB104 18213 LNS 31652 b1issued, the prediction market platform provider shall incur a 2civil penalty of $1,000,000 per day that the prediction market 3platform provider is operating in violation of the order.4    (e) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to preclude 5criminal prosecution under any other law.6    (f) The fact that a prediction market platform provider 7did not charge money or earn profit from activities in 8violation of this Section shall not be a defense to a violation 9of this Act.10    (g) The remedies and penalties in this Act are cumulative. 11Imposition of a penalty under this Act does not preclude the 12Attorney General from taking any other action authorized for 13the same violation. 14    Section 65. Rulemaking authority. The Attorney General 15shall adopt rules as are necessary to implement and administer 16this Act. 17    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 18severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.